it: Tipo di coltello: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton sampler; EDC; Caccia; Da melone; Multiuso; Fungo; Muskrat; Peanut; A penna; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Trapper; Posata; Altro
ko: 칼 유형: 큰 주머니칼; 캠핑카; 카누; 수집기; 회의; 코튼 샘플러; EDC; 사냥; 멜론 테스터; 멀티툴; 버섯; 사향쥐; 땅콩; 펜; 소드버스터; 스톡맨; 개복치; 이쑤시개; 덫사냥꾼; 기구; 기타
vi: Loại dao: Dao nhíp; Dao cắm trại; Xuồng; Dao sưu tầm; Dao congress; Dao cotton sampler; EDC; Dao đi săn; Dao thử dưa; Dao đa năng; Nấm; Dao muskrat; Hạt lạc; Bút; Dao sodbuster; Dao stockman; Dao cá thái dương; Dao nhọn; Dao bẫy; Dụng cụ; Khác
pl: Typ noża: Soczewka Barlowa; Kamper; Kanadyjka; Kolekcjoner; Kongres; Próbnik bawełny; EDC; Łowiectwo; Tester melonów; Narzędzie wielofunkcyjne; Grzyb; Piżmak; Orzech ziemny; Kojec; Rolnicy; Opiekun stada; Samogłów; Wykałaczka; Traper; Przybory kuchenne; Inne
nl: Mestype: Barlow; Kampeerder; Kano; Verzamelaar; Congres; Katoenen merklap; EDC; Jagen; Meloentester; Multi-tool; Paddestoel; Muskusrat; Pinda; Kooi; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Tandenstoker; Trapper; Werktuig; Andere
tr: Bıçak Tipi: Barlow; Kampçı; Kano; Kolektör; Kongre; Pamuk örnekleyici; EDC; Avcılık; Kavun test cihazı; Çok amaçlı alet; Mantar; Misk faresi; Fıstık; Kalem; Bahçe pulluğu; Sığır çobanı; Güneş balığı; Kürdan; Tuzakçı; Gereç; Diğer
ja: ナイフの種類: バーロウ; キャンピングカー; カヌー; コレクター; コングレス; コットンサンプラー; EDC; 狩猟; メロンテスター; マルチツール; マッシュルーム; マスカラット; ピーナッツ; ペン; ソドバスター; ストックマン; マンボウ; 爪楊枝; トラッパー; ユーテンシル; その他
th: ประเภทมีด: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton sampler; EDC; มีดพราน; มีดดูเนื้อผลไม้; มีดอเนกประสงค์; เห็ด; Muskrat; ถั่วลิสง; คอก; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Trapper; มีดตัดอาหาร; อื่นๆ
cs: Typ nože: Barlow; Tábornický; Kanoe; Sběratelský; Kongresový; Vzorkovací na bavlnu; EDC; Lov; Tester na meloun; Víceúčelový nástroj; Houba; Muskrat; Arašídy; Kapesní; Na odstraňování trávníku (Sodbuster); Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Traperský; Příborový; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta noža: Žepni večnamenski; Za kampiranje; Kanu; Zbirateljski; Kongresni; Vzorčevalec bombaža; EDC; Lov; Preskuševalec melon; Večnamensko orodje; Gobasto; Muskrat; Žepni z ročajem, ki spominja na arašid; Pisalo; Sodbuster; Stockman; Žepni sunfish; Žepni dolgi; Žepni trapper; Jedilni; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de faca: Barlow; Campismo; Canoa; Colecionador; Congresso; Coletor de amostras de algodão; EDC; Caça; Faca de melão; Multiferramentas; Cogumelo; Rato almiscarado; Amendoim; Caneta; Sodbuster; Stockman; Peixe-lua; Palito de dentes; Caçador; Utensílio; Outro
fr: Type de couteau: Barlow; Campeur; Canoë; Collectionneur; Congrès; Échantillonneur de coton; EDC; Chasse; Testeur de melons; Multi-outil; Champignon; Muskrat; Cacahuète; Enclos; Sodbuster; Stockman; Poisson-lune; Cure-dent; Trappeur; Ustensile; Autre
ro-RO: Tip cuțit: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton sampler; EDC; Vânătoare; Testare pepene galben; Multi-tool; Ciuperci; Bizam; Arahide; Stilou; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Trapper; Utensil; Altele
sk-SK: Typ noža: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton sampler; EDC; Lovecký; Melon tester; Viacúčelový; Hríbový; Muskrat; Peanut; Pen; Sodbuster; Stockman; Slnečnica; Toothpick; Trapper; Utensil; Iné
hr-HR: Vrsta noža: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton sampler; EDC; Hunting; Melon tester; Multi-tool; Mushroom; Muskrat; Peanut; Pen; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Trapper; Utensil; Ostalo
fi: Veitsityyppi: Barlow; Asuntoauto; Kanootti; Keräilijä; Kongressi; Puuvillanäyte; EDC; Metsästys; Melonin testaaja; Monikäyttötyökalu; Sieni; Piisami; Maapähkinä; Karsina; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Hammastikku; Trapper; Utensil; Muu
sv: Knivtyp: Barlow; Camping; Kanot; Samlar; Kongress; Bomullsprovtagare; EDC; Jakt; Melontestare; Multiverktyg; Svamp; Muskrat; Jordnöt; Hage; Sodbuster; Stockman; Solfisk; Tandpetare; Trapper; Redskap; Övrigt
el: Τύπος μαχαιριού: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton sampler; EDC; Κυνήγι; Melon tester; Multi-tool; Μυκητοειδής; Muskrat; Peanut; Pen; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Trapper; Utensil; Άλλο
ru: Тип ножа: Барлоу; Кемпер; Каноэ; Складной; Мультитул; Хлопковый; EDC; Охота; Сосисочный нож; Мультитул; Для грибов; Ондатра; Арахис; Перо; Содбастер; Штокман; Санфиш; Зубочистка; Траппер; Утварь; Другой
nb: Knivtype: Barlow; Bobil; Kano; Samler; Kongress; Bomullsprøve; EDC; Jakt; Melontester; Flerberøring; Sopp; Muskrat; Peanøtt; Penn; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Tannpirker; Trapper; Redskap; Annet
bg-BG: Тип нож: Барлоу; Кемпер; Кану; Колектор; Конгрес; Семплер за памук; EDC; Лов; Тестер за пъпеши; Мултифункционален инструмент; Гъба; Мускрат; Фъстък; Перо; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Клечка за зъби; Trapper; Прибор за хранене; Други
zh-TW: 刀型: 折疊刀; 軍刀; 折疊口袋刀; 折刀; 萬用刀; 魚肚刀; 小折刀; 狩獵; 特製水果刀; 多功能工具; 蘑菇; 口袋刀; 花生; 筆刀; 紳士刀; 袖珍刀; 魚頭刀; 牙籤; 口袋獵刀; 餐具; 其他
da: Knivtype: Barlow; Camping; Kano; Samler; Kongres; Bomuldsprøvetager; EDC; Jagt; Melontester; Multiværktøj; Champignon; Bisamrotte; Jordnød; Indelukke; Sodbuster; Stockman; Solfisk; Tandstikker; Trapper; Redskab; Andet
de: Messertyp: Barlow; Taschenmesser; Kanu; Sammler; Congress; Cotton Sampler; EDC; Jagd; Melon Tester; Mehrzweck; Pilz; Muskrat; Erdnuss; Pen; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Trapper; Utensil; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 刀具类型: 巴洛刀; 露营者; 独木舟; 集电极; 国会; 棉花采样器; EDC; 狩猎用品; 甜瓜测试仪; 多功能工具; 蘑菇; 麝香鼠; 花生; 小窝; 农夫; 畜牧业者; 翻车鱼; 牙签; 捕捉器; 用具; 其他
es: Tipo de cuchillo: Barlow; Campista; Canoa; Coleccionista; Congreso; Muestra de algodón; EDC; Caza; Probador de melón; Multiherramienta; Seta; Rata almizclera; Cacahuete; Redil; Sodbuster; Stockman; Pez luna; Palillo; Trampero; Utensilio; Otros
en: Knife type: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton sampler; EDC; Hunting; Melon tester; Multi-tool; Mushroom; Muskrat; Peanut; Pen; Sodbuster; Stockman; Sunfish; Toothpick; Trapper; Utensil; Other
hu: Kés típusa: Barlow; Camper; Canoe; Collector; Congress; Cotton Sampler; EDC; Vadász; Melon Tester; Többfunkciós; Gombász; Muskrat; Földimogyoró; Toll; Sodbuster; Stockman; Naphal; Fogpiszkáló; Csapdázó; Szerszám; Egyéb
lt-LT: Peilio tipas: Sulankstomas; Daugiafunkcis; Dvipusis; Kolekcinis; Dvipusis dviejų dalių; Medvilnės mėginių; EDC; Medžioklinis; Melionams išmėginti; Universalus; Grybų; Odlupio; Žemės riešutų; „Pen“ geležtė; Tradicinis; Trimis geležtėmis; Trumpa geležte; Plona geležte; Dviem geležtėmis; Virtuvinis; Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de faca: Barlow; Campista; Canoa; Colecionador; Congresso; Amostrador de algodão; EDC; Caça; Testador de melão; Multiferramentas; Cogumelo; Rato almiscarado; Amendoim; Cercado; Sodbuster; Estoquista; Peixe-lua; Palito de dente; Caçador; Utensílio; Outro